Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-634
Manufacturer-distributor; lottery supplies; approval required.

Each manufacturer-distributor shall receive departmental approval of lottery supplies prior to offering or marketing in this state any type of lottery supplies for use in a lottery conducted pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act. Approval by the department shall be based upon, but not be limited to, conformance with specifications imposed by the department regarding the manufacture, assembly, and packaging of lottery supplies, the provisions of the act, and any other specifications imposed by rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 74.